cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů > Pořadače: Stolní organizéry; Zásuvkové organizéry; Pořadače na dokumenty; Držáky per
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов > Органайзеры для рабочих столов: Настольные органайзеры; Органайзеры для ящиков; Подставки для папок и документов; Подставки для пишущих принадлежностей
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품 > 책상 정리함: 책상 위 정리함; 서랍 정리함; 파일 분류 용품; 연필꽂이
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija > Stolni organizatori: Organizatori za radni stol; Organizatori za ladice; Organizatori za dokumente; Držači za olovke
hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Asztalrendezők: Asztali szervezők; Fiókrendezők; Fájlrendezők; Tolltartók
es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización > Organizadores de escritorio: Organizadores de escritorio; Organizadores de cajones; Clasificadores de archivos; Portalápices
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品 > 桌面收納用品: 桌上收納用品; 抽屜收納用品; 文件分類夾; 筆筒
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση > Οργανωτές γραφείου: Επιτραπέζιοι οργανωτές; Οργανωτές συρταριών; Ταξινομητές φακέλων; Θήκες για στυλό
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare > Organizatoare pentru birou: Organizatoare de birou; Organizatoare pentru sertar; Sortatoare de fișiere; Suporturi pentru pixuri
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys > Työpöydän säilytysratkaisut: Pöydälle soveltuvat säilytysratkaisut; Lokeron säilytysratkaisut; Tiedostojärjestelijät; Kynätelineet
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization > Desk Organizers: Desktop Organizers; Drawer Organizers; File Sorters; Pen Holders
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー > デスクオーガナイザー: デスクトップオーガナイザー; 引き出しオーガナイザー; ファイルソーター; ペンホルダー
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Staliniai reikmenų laikikliai: Darbo stalo reikmenų laikikliai; Stalčių dėklai; Bylų rūšiavimo laikikliai; Rašiklių laikikliai
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia > Stolové organizéry: Stolové organizéry; Zásuvkové organizéry; Triediče spisov; Držiaky na perá
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov > Namizni organizatorji: Organizatorji namizja; Organizatorji predalov; Razvrščevalniki datotek; Držala za pisala
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ > ที่จัดระเบียบโต๊ะทำงาน: ที่จัดระเบียบตั้งโต๊ะ; ที่จัดระเบียบลิ้นชัก; ที่ใส่เอกสารแบบคัดแยก; ที่วางปากกา
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation > Organisateurs de bureau: Organisateurs pour bureau; Organisateurs de tiroirs; Trieurs de fichiers; Porte-stylos
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация > Органайзери за бюро: Настолни органайзери; Органайзери за чекмеджета; Сортировачи на папки; Поставки за химикали
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering > Skrivebordsorganiserere: Skrivebordsorganisering; Skuffeorganisering; Filsorterere; Penneholdere
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation > Schreibtischorganizer: Desktop-Organizer; Schubladen-Organizer; Dokumenten-Sortierer; Stifthalter
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理 > 桌面文具盘: 桌面收纳用品; 抽屉收纳用品; 文件分类用品; 笔筒
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização > Organizadores de secretária: Organizadores de mesa; Organizadores de gavetas; Separadores para arquivos; Suportes para canetas
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen > Bureau-organizers: Bureaublad-organizers; Lade-organizers; Archiefsorteerders; Penhouders
da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering > Brevbakker: Skrivebordsorganisatorer; Skuffeorganisatorer; Filsortering; Penneholdere
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon > Masaüstü Düzenleyicileri: Masaüstü Organizerler; Çekmece Organizerleri; Dosya Sıralayıcıları; Kalem Tutucular
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering > Organisation för skrivbordet: Skrivbordsorganisatörer; Lådorganisatörer; Arkivsorterare; Pennhållare
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku > Organizery na biurko: Organizery na blat biurka; Organizery do szuflady; Sortery na dokumenty; Uchwyty na długopisy
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione > Portaoggetti da scrivania: Organizzatori da scrivania; Organizzatori per cassetti; Ordinatori di file; Portapenne
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização > Organizadores de escrivaninhas: Organizadores de mesa; Organizadores de gaveta; Classificadores de arquivos; Porta-canetas
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu > Khay đựng tài liệu để bàn: Khay đựng để bàn; Khay đựng trong ngăn kéo; Khay xếp tài liệu; Cốc cắm bút